Illinois, session 104th, SB1730.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Music 5Incubator Rebate Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Applicant" means the operator of an eligible music venue 8who applies for a rebate under this Act or an eligible music 9festival promoter who applies for a rebate under this Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity.12    "Eligible music festival promoter" means a music festival 13promoter that has held, at least once during the 2-year period 14immediately preceding the date of the application for a rebate 15under this Act, a qualified music festival in a county in the 16State with a population of less than 100,000.17    "Eligible music venue" means a retail establishment that:18        (1) has a dedicated audience capacity of not more than 19    3,000 persons;20        (2) has live performance and audience space;21        (3) has space for the storage of audio equipment or 22    musical instruments;23        (4) provides technical sound and lighting support,   SB1730- 2 -LRB104 05552 HLH 15582 b1    either in-house or through a contract with a vendor;2        (5) hosts live music performances on the premises 5 or 3    more nights per week, on average, whereby the musical 4    artist receives as compensation a specified percentage of 5    ticket sales or other sales that occur incident to the 6    performance or a guaranteed amount in advance of the 7    performance;8        (6) requires a cover charge to attend one or more of 9    the live music performances, either through ticketing or 10    through the imposition of a front door entrance fee; and11        (7) maintains hours of operation that coincide with 12    live music performance show times.13    "Qualified music festival" means an event that:14        (1) occurs over one or more days at a single location;15        (2) is marketed in a printed or electronic 16    publication;17        (3) features performances by one or more musical 18    artists who enter into a written contract with a music 19    festival promoter under which the artist receives as 20    compensation a specified percentage of ticket sales or 21    other sales that occur incident to the performance or a 22    guaranteed amount in advance of the performance;23        (4) requires a cover charge to attend one or more of 24    the performances, either through ticketing or through the 25    imposition of a front door entrance fee; and26        (5) results in the employment or contracting of the   SB1730- 3 -LRB104 05552 HLH 15582 b1    services of one or more people who are tasked with 2 or 2    more of the following positions or services:3            (A) sound engineer;4            (B) booker;5            (C) promoter;6            (D) stage manager; or7            (E) security personnel.8    "Retailers' occupation tax" means the tax imposed under 9the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and any retailers' 10occupation tax imposed by a unit of local government. 11    Section 10. Program established. 12    (a) For State fiscal years beginning on or after January 131, 2025, the Department shall administer a music incubator 14rebate program under which the Department shall provide to the 15operators of eligible music venues and to eligible music 16festival promoters, from moneys appropriated from the Music 17Incubator Fund, a full or partial rebate of the retailers' 18occupation taxes paid by those operators and eligible music 19festival promoters on the sale of beer and wine on the premises 20of the eligible music venue or at the location of the qualified 21music festival as part of the qualified music festival. The 22rebates are to assist eligible music venues and eligible music 23festival promoters in their efforts to support and continue to 24bring to local communities in this State live musical 25performances, including the recruitment of musical performance   SB1730- 4 -LRB104 05552 HLH 15582 b1artists.2    (b) The Department may not provide a rebate under this 3Section in any State fiscal year to an eligible music venue or 4an eligible music festival promoter in an amount that exceeds 5the lesser of:6        (1) the amount of retailers' occupation taxes paid by 7    the music venue or music festival promoter in the 8    preceding 12-month period; or9        (2) $100,000. 10    Section 15. Rebate application. Applicants shall apply to 11the Department for a rebate under this Act using an online 12portal on the Department's public Internet website that allows 13a music venue or music festival promoter to submit the 14application to the Department for consideration.15    The application must:16        (1) state the amount of eligible retailers' occupation 17    tax receipts for which the applicant is seeking a rebate;18        (2) include sufficient evidence for the Department to 19    determine that the music venue or promoter qualifies for a 20    rebate; and21        (3) include any other information the Department 22    determines necessary to administer the program under this 23    Act.24    After reviewing applications for a rebate under this Act, 25the Department shall grant rebates to eligible music venues   SB1730- 5 -LRB104 05552 HLH 15582 b1and music festival promoters that the Department determines 2provide or have committed to provide the most economic benefit 3to the communities in which the music venues are located or the 4festivals are held, as applicable, and to the Illinois music 5industry, including live music performers. 6    Section 20. Music Incubator Fund. The Music Incubator Fund 7is hereby created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 8Fund may receive gifts, grants, and moneys transferred or 9deposited from any lawful source. Moneys in the Fund shall be 10used by the Department to award rebates under this Act. 11    Section 25. Rules. The Department shall adopt rules for 12the implementation of this Act. 13    Section 900. The Department of Commerce and Economic 14Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 15is amended by adding Section 605-1118 as follows: 16    (20 ILCS 605/605-1118 new)17    Sec. 605-1118. Music Incubator Rebate Act. The Department 18shall award rebates as provided in the Music Incubator Rebate 19Act. 20    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 21Section 5.1030 as follows:   SB1730- 6 -LRB104 05552 HLH 15582 b1    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)2    Sec. 5.1030. The Music Incubator Fund. 3    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.